Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,269
Violation of child passenger restraint requirements; how construed.

Violations of the provisions of sections 60-6,267 and 60-6,268 shall not constitute prima facie evidence of negligence nor shall compliance with such sections constitute a defense to any claim for personal injuries to a child or recovery of medical expenses for injuries sustained in any motor vehicle accident. Violation of such sections by a driver shall not constitute a defense for another person to any claim for personal injuries to a child or recovery of medical expenses for injuries sustained in any motor vehicle accident.

Laws 1983, LB 306, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-6,103.03;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 365.